Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1645
Consulting board required; when; liability for costs.

When the safety and technical considerations pertaining to an application approval, an approval to operate, or the plans and specifications of a dam require it, or when requested in writing by the owner, the Chief Water Officer shall appoint a consulting board of three or more consultants to report to the Chief Water Officer on the safety features involved. The cost and expense of a consulting board, if appointed at the request of an owner, shall be paid by the owner.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 45;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 283.